Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.060

Violations—Application of consumer protection act.

Violation of this chapter constitutes a violation of chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer protection act. It shall be presumed that damages to the consumer are equal to the purchase price of any telephone equipment sold in violation of this chapter up to one hundred dollars. Additional damages must be proved.

[ 1984 c 275 s 7.]